apertium-ckb.ckb.twol
<<<<<<< HEAD
Alphabet
  ا ب ج د ە ف گ ه ح ژ ک ل م ن ۆ پ ق ر س ت ئ ڤ و خ ی ز چ غ ‌ع ڵ ڕ ش و وو ك ء ة ي
  %{A%}:ە %{A%}:0
  %{a%}:ە %{a%}:0
  %{C%}:ێک %{C%}:یەک
  %{O%}:0 %{O%}:ۆ
  %{W%}:و %{W%}:ۆ
  %{Y%}:0 %{Y%}:ی
  %{I%}:ا %{I%}:ێ
  %{W%}:و %{W%}:ۆ
  %{y%}:ی %{y%}:0
  %{e%}:ی %{e%}:ێ
  %{i%}:ە %{i%}:0
  %{w%}:و %{w%}:وو
  %{k%}:ک
  %>:0;

Sets

Vowel = ا ە ۆ و ی و وو;

Rules

"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

"Remove ە from ەکە and ەکان after one of the two vowels ە and ا"
%{A%}:0 <=> :ە %>:0 _ ;
            :ا %>:0 _ ;

"Change indefinite singular noun ending from ێک to یەک for noun ending with ایێۆ"
%{C%}:یە <=> ە %>:0 _ ;
          ا %>:0 _ ;
          ی %>:0 _ ;
          ێ %>:0 _ ;
          ۆ %>:0 _ ;

"Add ی before ان pluralization for noun ending with ە or ا"
%{Y%}:ی <=> :ە %>:0 _ ;
            :ا %>:0 _ ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
=======
Alphabet
  ا ب ج د ە ف گ ه ح ژ ک ل م ن ۆ پ ق ر س ت ئ ڤ و خ ی ز چ غ ‌ع ڵ ڕ ش و وو
  %{A%}:ە %{A%}:0
  %{a%}:ە %{a%}:0
  %{C%}:ێک %{C%}:یەک
  %{O%}:0 %{O%}:ۆ
  %{W%}:و %{W%}:ۆ
  %{Y%}:0 %{Y%}:ی
  %{I%}:ا %{I%}:ێ
  %{W%}:و %{W%}:ۆ
  %{y%}:ی %{y%}:0
  %{e%}:ی %{e%}:ێ
  %{i%}:ە %{i%}:0
  %{w%}:و %{w%}:وو
  %{k%}:ک
  %>:0;

Sets

Vowel = ا ە ۆ و ی و وو;

Rules

"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

"Remove ە from ەکە and ەکان after one of the two vowels ە and ا"
%{A%}:0 <=> :ە %>:0 _ ;
            :ا %>:0 _ ;

"Change indefinite singular noun ending from ێک to یەک for noun ending with ایێۆ"
%{C%}:یە <=> ە %>:0 _ ;
          ا %>:0 _ ;
          ی %>:0 _ ;
          ێ %>:0 _ ;
          ۆ %>:0 _ ;

"Add ی before ان pluralization for noun ending with ە or ا"
%{Y%}:ی <=> :ە %>:0 _ ;
            :ا %>:0 _ ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
>>>>>>> 4e73b5eafb758d66752c65bce53f591fa13163f7
